test/src/morphology/izh-test-N-lintu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - lintu: # Noun 'bird'
     lintu+N+Sg+Nom: lintu
     lintu+N+Sg+Gen: linnun
     lintu+N+Sg+Acc: linnun
     lintu+N+Sg+Part: lintuua
     lintu+N+Sg+Ill: lintuu
     lintu+N+Sg+Ine: linnuus
     lintu+N+Sg+Ela: linnust
     lintu+N+Sg+All: linnulle
     lintu+N+Sg+Ade: linnuul
     lintu+N+Sg+Abl: linnult
     lintu+N+Sg+Tra: linnuks
     lintu+N+Sg+Ess: lintuun
     lintu+N+Sg+Exe: lintuunt

     lintu+N+Pl+Nom: linnut
     lintu+N+Pl+Gen: lintuloin
     lintu+N+Pl+Acc: linnut
     lintu+N+Pl+Part: lintuloja
     lintu+N+Pl+Ill: lintuloihe
     lintu+N+Pl+Ine: lintulois
     lintu+N+Pl+Ela: lintuloist
     lintu+N+Pl+All: lintuloille
     lintu+N+Pl+Ade: lintuloil
     lintu+N+Pl+Abl: lintuloilt
     lintu+N+Pl+Tra: lintuloiks
     lintu+N+Pl+Ess: lintuloin
     lintu+N+Pl+Exe: lintuloint
